Virginia statutes. Title 45.2. Mines, Minerals, and Energy.
Article 7. Hoisting.

§ 45.2-735.
Hoisting equipment.

Every hoist used for handling miners shall be equipped with overspeed, overwind, and automatic stop controls.

Every suspended work deck or platform shall (i) operate automatically, (ii) be equipped with guardrails capable of protecting miners and materials from accidental overturning, and (iii) be equipped with safety belts and such other protective devices as the Chief shall require by regulation.

Every platform or work deck that is used for transporting miners or materials shall be equipped with leveling indicators, and such conveyance shall be maintained and operated in a reasonably level position at all times.

Every shaft, slope, or surface incline hoist shall be equipped with brakes capable of stopping and holding the fully loaded unbalanced cage or trip at any point in the shaft or slope or on the surface incline.

An accurate and reliable indicator showing the position of the cage or trip shall be placed so as to be in clear view of the hoisting engineer, unless the position of the cage or trip is clearly visible at all times to the hoisting engineer or other person operating the equipment.

Any conveyance that is used to haul miners or materials within a shaft or slope shall be (i) designed to prevent materials from falling back into the shaft or slope and (ii) equipped with a retaining edge of at least six inches to prevent objects from falling into the shaft or slope.

History.

Code 1950, § 45-68.4; 1954, c. 191; 1966, c. 594, §§ 45.1-68, 45.1-69; 1972, c. 784; 1978, c. 729; 1994, c. 28; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2021.

§ 45.2-736.
Hoisting ropes.

The hoisting rope on any cage or trip shall be adequate in size to handle the load. A rope that is used to hoist or lower coal and other materials shall have a factor of safety of at least five to one. A rope that is used to hoist or lower miners shall have a factor of safety of at least 10 to one.

Each hoisting rope shall have at least three full turns remaining on the drum when extended to its maximum working length. The rope shall make at least one full turn on the drum shaft, or around the spoke of the drum in the case of a free drum, and be fastened securely by means of clamps.

Each hoisting rope shall be fastened to its load by (i) a spelter-filled socket or (ii) a thimble and an adequate number of clamps that are properly spaced and installed.

Any cage, mancar, or trip used for hoisting or lowering miners with a single rope shall be provided with two bridle chains or wire ropes connected securely to the rope at least three feet above the socket or thimble and clamps and to the crosspiece of the cage or to the mancar or trip. Multiple hoisting ropes installed pursuant to subsection C may be used in lieu of two bridle chains.

If equipment or supplies are being hoisted or lowered in the slope, safety chains or wire ropes shall be provided and connected securely to the hoist rope. In addition, visible or audible warning devices shall be installed in the slope where they may be seen or heard by any miner approaching the slope track entry from any access.

History.

Code 1950, § 45-68.4; 1954, c. 191; 1966, c. 594, §§ 45.1-68, 45.1-89.1; 1972, c. 784; 1978, c. 729; 1983, c. 111; 1994, c. 28, § 45.1-161.154; 2005, c. 3; 2011, cc. 826, 862; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2005, c. 3, cl. 4 provides: “That an emergency exists and this act is in force from its passage [February 10, 2005].”

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387, cl. 13 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on October 1, 2021.”

§ 45.2-737.
Hoisting cages.

Any cage used for hoisting miners shall be of substantial construction and have (i) adequate steel bonnets, with enclosed sides; (ii) gates, safety chains, or bars across the ends of the cage when miners are being hoisted or lowered; and (iii) sufficient handholds or chains for all miners on the cage to maintain their balance. A locking device to prevent tilting of the cage shall be used on all self-dumping cages when transporting miners.

The floor of each cage shall be constructed so that it is (i) adequate to carry the load and (ii) impossible for a miner’s foot or body to enter any opening in the bottom of the cage.

Each cage used for hoisting miners shall be equipped with safety catches that act quickly and effectively in case of an emergency. The provisions of this subsection shall not apply to a capsule or bucket that is used for emergency escape or during shaft or slope sinking.

History.

Code 1950, § 45-68.4; 1954, c. 191; 1966, c. 594, § 45.1-69; 1978, c. 729; 1994, c. 28, § 45.1-161.155; 1997, c. 293; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2021.

§ 45.2-738.
Shaft and slope conditions.

Every shaft shall be equipped with safety gates at the top and at each landing. Safety gates shall be kept closed except when the cage is being loaded or unloaded.

At the bottom of each hoisting shaft and at each intermediate landing, a runaround shall be provided for safe passage from one side of the shaft to the other. This passageway shall be at least five feet in height and three feet in width.

Ice shall not be permitted to accumulate excessively in any shaft where miners are hoisted or lowered.

Positive-acting stopblocks or derails shall be installed near the top and at intermediate landings of slopes and surface inclines and at the approaches to all shaft landings.

Positive-acting stopblocks or derails shall be installed on the haulage track in the slope near the top of the slope. The stopblocks or derails shall be in a position to hold or stop any load to be lowered into the mine, including heavy mining equipment, until such time as the equipment is to be lowered into the mine by the hoist.

History.

Code 1950, § 45-68.4; 1954, c. 191; 1966, c. 594, §§ 45.1-69, 45.1-89.1; 1978, c. 729; 1983, c. 111; 1994, c. 28, § 45.1-161.156; 1996, c. 774; 2005, c. 3; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2005, c. 3, cl. 4 provides: “That an emergency exists and this act is in force from its passage [February 10, 2005].”

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387, cl. 13 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on October 1, 2021.”

§ 45.2-739.
Signaling; signal code.

Two independent means of signaling shall be provided between the top, bottom, and every intermediate landing of each shaft, slope, or surface incline and the hoisting station. At least one of these means of signaling shall be audible to the hoisting engineer or other person operating the equipment. Bell cords shall be installed in each shaft in such a manner as to prevent unnecessary movement of such cords within the shaft.

A uniform signal code approved by the Chief shall be in use at each mine and shall be kept at the cage station designated by the mine foreman.

History.

Code 1950, § 45-68.4; 1954, c. 191; 1966, c. 594, § 45.1-69; 1978, c. 729; 1994, c. 28, § 45.1-161.157; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2021.

§ 45.2-740.
Inspections of hoisting equipment.

Before hoisting or lowering any miner in a shaft, the hoisting engineer shall operate an empty cage up and down each shaft for at least one round trip, both at the beginning of each shift and after the hoist has been idle for one hour or more.

Before hoisting or lowering any miner by slope or surface incline hoisting, the hoisting engineer shall operate an empty cage for at least one round trip, both at the beginning of each shift and after the hoist has been idle for one hour or more.

The hoisting engineer, at the time the inspections required by subsection A or B are performed, shall (i) inspect all cable or rope fastenings on every cage, bucket, or slope car; (ii) inspect hammer locks and pins, thimbles, and clamps; (iii) inspect safety chains on every cage, bucket, or slope car; (iv) inspect each braking system for malfunctions; (v) clean all excess oil and extraneous materials from the hoist housing construction; (vi) inspect the overwind, overtravel, and lilly switch or control from stopping at the collar and within 100 feet of the work deck; and (vii) check communications between the top house, work deck, and work deck tugger house.

The hoisting engineer shall inspect the hoisting rope on every cage or trip at the beginning of each shift.

A test of safety catches on every cage shall be made by an authorized person designated by the operator at least once each month. A written record shall be kept of such tests, and such record shall be available for inspection by interested persons.

An authorized person designated by the operator shall inspect daily the hoisting equipment, including the headgear, cages, ropes, connections, links and chains, shaft guides, shaft walls, and other facilities. Such person shall also inspect every bull wheel and lighting system on the head frame. Such person shall report immediately to the operator or his agent any defect found, and all such defects shall be corrected promptly. The person making such examination shall make a daily permanent record of such inspection, which shall be available for inspection by interested persons. If a hoist is used only during a weekly examination of an escapeway, then the inspection required by this subsection shall only be required to be completed weekly before the examination occurs.

Subsections A, B, C, and D shall not apply to automatically operated elevators.

History.

Code 1950, § 45-68.4; 1954, c. 191; 1966, c. 594, §§ 45.1-68, 45.1-69; 1972, c. 784; 1978, c. 729; 1994, c. 28, § 45.1-161.158; 1999, c. 256; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2021.

§ 45.2-741.
Hoisting engineers.

If miners are transported into or out of an underground area of a mine by a hoist or on a surface incline, a certified hoisting engineer shall be either on duty continuously or available within a reasonable time, as determined by the Chief, to provide immediate transportation while any person is underground.

When any miner is being hoisted or lowered in a shaft or on a slope or surface incline, the loading and unloading of any miner and the movement of the cage, car, or trip shall be under the direction of an authorized person.

Subsections A and B shall not apply to automatically operated elevators that can be safely operated by any miner; however, a person qualified as an automatic elevator operator shall be available at any such elevator within a reasonable time, as determined by the Chief.

An operator or agent of such operator of any mine worked by shaft, slope, or surface incline shall place a competent and sober hoisting engineer in charge of any engine or drum used for lowering or hoisting miners. No hoisting engineer in charge of such machinery shall allow any person, except a person who is designated for such purpose by the operator or his agent, to interfere with any part of the machinery. No person shall interfere with or intimidate a hoisting engineer or automatic elevator operator who is engaged in the discharge of his duties.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 45-7, 45-12, 45-68.4, 45-69, 45-73, 45-75, 45-78, 45-79, 45-81, 45-83; 1950, p. 156; 1954, c. 191; 1966, c. 594, §§ 45.1-21, 45.1-68, 45.1-69; 1972, c. 784; 1976, c. 598; 1978, cc. 222, 489, 729; 1982, c. 255; 1984, cc. 178, 590; 1988, c. 577; 1993, cc. 171, 442; 1994, c. 28, § 45.1-161.159; 1999, c. 256; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2021.

§ 45.2-742.
Operations of hoisting equipment.

The speed of the cage, car, or trip in a shaft or slope or on a surface incline shall not exceed 1,000 feet per minute when a miner is being hoisted or lowered.

When moving the platform or work deck, every miner traveling thereon shall have a safety belt secured.

No miner shall ride on a loaded cage.

The number of miners riding in any cage or car at one time shall not exceed the maximum prescribed by the manufacturer. The Chief may prescribe a lesser number when necessary to ensure the safety of miners being transported.

Any conveyance being lowered into a shaft in which a miner is working shall be stopped at least 20 feet above the area where such miner is working.

If any miner is working at the bottom of a shaft, there shall be an adjustable ladder or chain ladder attached to the work deck to provide an additional means of escape. Such ladder shall be at least 20 feet in length.

Every choker or sling used to transport materials within a shaft or slope shall meet specifications established by the American National Standards Institute.

History.

Code 1950, § 45-68.4; 1954, c. 191; 1966, c. 594, §§ 45.1-68, 45.1-69; 1972, c. 784; 1978, c. 729; 1994, c. 28, § 45.1-161.160; 1996, c. 774; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2021.

§ 45.2-743.
Maintenance of hoisting equipment.

Every hoist, rope, cage, and other component of any piece of hoisting equipment shall be maintained in a safe operating condition, as directed by the Chief. A hoisting rope shall be replaced as soon as there is evidence of possible failure.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 45-68.4, 45-69.3; 1954, c. 191; 1966, c. 594, §§ 45.1-68, 45.1-72; 1972, c. 784; 1978, c. 729; 1994, c. 28, § 45.1-161.161; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2021.